Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.400

Consolidation of local governmental unit and first-class city retirement system—Intent.

It is the purpose of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 to govern the retirement rights of persons whose employment status is altered when: (1) Two or more units of local government of this state, at least one of which is a first-class city with its own retirement system, enter into an agreement for the consolidated performance of a governmental service, activity, or undertaking; (2) the service, activity, or undertaking is to be performed either by one of the participating local governmental units or by a newly established separate legal entity; and (3) the employees of the participating local governmental units are not all members of the same Washington public retirement system.

RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 are not intended to and do not govern retirement rights of any members of the retirement systems established by chapter 41.16, 41.18, 41.20, or 41.26 RCW, or of employees described in RCW 35.58.265, 35.58.390, or 70.08.070. To the extent there is any conflict between RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 and RCW 41.04.110, the provisions of RCW 41.04.405 through 41.04.430 shall govern.

[ 1984 c 184 s 22.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.